Utah statutes.
78A-6-502.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Division" means the Division of Child and Family Services within the
Department of Human Services.
(2)  "Failure of parental adjustment" means that a parent or parents are
unable or unwilling within a reasonable time to substantially correct the
circumstances, conduct, or conditions that led to placement of their child
outside of their home, notwithstanding reasonable and appropriate efforts made
by the Division of Child and Family Services to return the child to that home.
(3)  "Plan" means a written agreement between the parents of a child, who has
been removed from the child's home by the juvenile court, and the Division of
Child and Family Services or written conditions and obligations imposed upon
the parents directly by the juvenile court, that have a primary objective of
reuniting the family or, if the parents fail or refuse to comply with the
terms and conditions of the case plan, freeing the child for adoption.
